District of Columbia statutes.
48-801.06

Consumer information to reflect actual charges.

A pharmacy may charge any current selling price, discount, service availability or service charge, at any time; provided, that the poster and sources of consumer information are adjusted accordingly.

History

Sept. 10, 1976, D.C. Law 1-81, title I, § 106, 23 DCR 2460

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-716.
1973 Ed., § 33-816.